Virginia statutes. Title 16.1. Courts Not of Record.
Chapter 10. Virginia Juvenile Justice Information System.

§ 16.1-222.
Established; powers of Director.

There is hereby established within the Department of Juvenile Justice the Virginia Juvenile Justice Information System which shall operate separate and apart from the Central Criminal Records Exchange.

The Director of the Department of Juvenile Justice is authorized to employ such personnel, establish such offices, acquire such equipment and use such available equipment as shall be necessary to carry out the purpose of this chapter. He is further authorized to enter into agreements with other state agencies for services to be performed for the Virginia Juvenile Justice Information System by employees of such other agencies.

History.

1976, c. 589; 1989, c. 733.

Cross references.

As to personal information systems which are exempt from the Government Data Collection and Dissemination Practices Act, see §

2.2-3802

.

Law Review.

For article, “The Revision of Virginia’s Juvenile Court Law,” see 13 U. Rich. L. Rev. 847 (1979).

For a book review, “Random Violence and the Transformation of the Juvenile Justice Debate,” see 86 Va. L. Rev. 1095 (2000).

§ 16.1-223.
Receipt, etc., of data; forms for reports; confidentiality.

The Virginia Juvenile Justice Information System shall receive, classify and file data reported to it pursuant to §

16.1-224

. The Director is authorized to prepare and furnish to all court service personnel automated data processing equipment, which shall be used for making the data submissions.

Data stored in the Virginia Juvenile Justice Information System shall be confidential, and information from such data that may be used to identify a juvenile may be released only in accordance with §

16.1-300

.The data submissions may be made available to the Central Criminal Records Exchange or any other automated data processing system, unless the data is identifiable with a particular juvenile. The State Board of Juvenile Justice shall promulgate regulations governing the security and confidentiality of the data submission.

History.

1976, c. 589; 1978, c. 684; 1988, c. 541; 2001, cc. 203, 215.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendments by cc. 203 and 215 are identical, and in subsection A, deleted “required to be” following “file data,” and substituted “pursuant to” for “by”; in subsection B, in the first paragraph, inserted “and information from such data that may be used to identify a juvenile may be released only in accordance with §

16.1-300

,” and deleted the former second sentence, which formerly read: “The information from such data which may be used to identify a juvenile shall be released only to the judge, prosecuting attorney and probation officers assigned to serve a court having the child currently before it in any proceeding in accordance with standards adopted by the Department of Juvenile Justice,” and substituted “State Board” for “Department” in the last paragraph.

§ 16.1-224.
Data submissions by court service units.

All court service units serving juvenile and domestic relations district courts shall make data submissions to the Virginia Juvenile Justice Information System of any persons referred to an intake officer of a court service unit pursuant to §

16.1-260

, except that no data submission shall be required for a juvenile charged with a traffic infraction as defined in §

46.2-100

.

In the case of a juvenile who is alleged to be delinquent and who is referred to a court service unit pursuant to §

16.1-260

, the data submissions required by subsection A of this section shall contain the name, date of birth and, if any, the social security number of the juvenile before the court. The data submissions concerning all other children coming before a juvenile and domestic relations district court, except those charged with traffic infractions, may in accordance with standards adopted by the Department of Juvenile Justice, contain information identifying the child.

The court service unit shall make a data submission to the Virginia Juvenile Justice Information System of the final disposition of each case reported to the System. When the court service unit reports a disposition of a case which is other than a finding of guilty, the name and other personal identification of the juvenile shall be deleted from the data submissions required by subsection B of this section and from the report of final disposition required by this subsection.

History.

1976, c. 589; 1978, c. 684; 1988, c. 541.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1993, c. 930, cl. 3, as amended by Acts 1994, c. 564, cl. 2, and Acts 1996, c. 616, cl. 4, provides that the amendment to this section by Acts 1993, c. 930, cl. 1, shall become effective June 1, 1998, “if state funds are provided, including all local costs, to carry out the purposes of this bill by the General Assembly.” The funding was not provided.

§ 16.1-225.
Penalty for violation of confidentiality of records.

Any person who knowingly and willfully violates the provisions of this chapter which require confidentiality of such records shall be guilty of a Class 2 misdemeanor.

History.

1976, c. 589; 1977, c. 360; 1988, c. 541.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 2 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.